District of Columbia statutes.
8-1447

Establishment of Hazardous Materials Reimbursement Fund.

(a)

There is established within the General Fund of the District of Columbia a segregated, nonlapsing fund to be known as the Hazardous Materials Reimbursement Fund. All funds as set forth in subsection (b) of this section shall be deposited into the Fund without regard to fiscal year limitation and shall not revert to the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section. The Fund shall be administered by the Mayor.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit into the Fund all costs recovered by the District of Columbia pursuant to this subchapter.

(c)

All funds deposited shall be available for use by the Mayor to reimburse District of Columbia agencies for costs incurred by the release or threatened release of the hazardous materials identified in § 8-1442.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 307, 54 DCR 794
This section is referenced in § 8-1441.